Mississippi, session 2026, HB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Sections 27-19-21 and 27-19-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, which impose an annual tax on electric vehicles and hybrid vehicles in addition to other taxes for which the vehicles are liable, are repealed. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.